apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.ca.dix
   <pardef n="anti/c__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gues</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cs</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
    <!--  <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssimes</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssima</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssims</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssim</l>
          <r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="annex__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="bo__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nes</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
  <!--    <e>
        <p>
          <l>níssimes</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>níssima</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>níssims</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>níssim</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="preco/ç__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ços</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ç</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ç</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="com/ú__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unes</l>
          <r>ú<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>una</l>
          <r>ú<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uns</l>
          <r>ú<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="ate/u__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="feli/ç__adj">
           
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ç</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ç</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ços</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>ç<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
  </pardef>

 <pardef n="j/ove__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oves</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oves</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>óvens</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>óvens</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ove</l>
          <r>ove<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="amarg__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ues</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="ma/co__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ques</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cos</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
  <!--    <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssimes</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssima</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssims</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>quíssim</l>
          <r>co<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e> -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mi/g__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tges</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tja</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tjos</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="mig"><i>mi</i><par n="mi/g__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ple"><i>ple</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ineficaç"><i>inefica</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="va"><i>va</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="llarg"><i>llarg</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="europeu"><i>europe</i><par n="ate/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="espars"><i>espars</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="infeliç"><i>infeli</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="precoç"><i>preco</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="necròfag"><i>necròfag</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="calcífug"><i>calcífug</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fal·laç"><i>fal·la</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="audaç"><i>auda</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feliç"><i>feli</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="deshonest"><i>deshonest</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="divers"><i>divers</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="copròfag"><i>copròfag</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fi"><i>fi</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="capaç"><i>capa</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="propens"><i>propens</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jove"><i>j</i><par n="j/ove__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eficaç"><i>efica</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sacríleg"><i>sacríleg</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sapròfag"><i>sapròfag</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feroç"><i>fero</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="advers"><i>advers</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hidròfug"><i>hidròfug</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oportú"><i>oport</i><par n="com/ú__adj"/></e>
<e lm="febrífug"><i>febrífug</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fitòfag"><i>fitòfag</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amarg"><i>amarg</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maco"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/co__adj"/></e>
<e lm="veraç"><i>vera</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inoportú"><i>inoport</i><par n="com/ú__adj"/></e>
<e lm="centrífug"><i>centrífug</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="baix"><i>baix</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fugaç"><i>fuga</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="perspicaç"><i>perspica</i><par n="feli/ç__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pla"><i>pla</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gris"><i>gris</i><par n="annex__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eritreu"><i>eritre</i><par n="ate/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ignífug"><i>ignífug</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="antropòfag"><i>antropòfag</i><par n="amarg__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sa"><i>sa</i><par n="bo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="antic"><i>anti</i><par n="anti/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incapaç"><i>incapa</i><par n="preco/ç__adj"/></e>
